Louisiana, session 2026, HB437.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Evidence Article 702(C) and (D) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 702. Testimony by experts
* * *
C. Except in criminal court, traffic court, or juvenile proceedings, a witness
with a pecuniary interest in the outcome of the case shall not be qualified as an
expert.
D. (1) "Pecuniary interest" means any compensation from or relating to a
settlement or an award of damages, engagement to provide goods or services
connected to an award or settlement, or any financial benefit from or relating to the
testimony besides the compensation to be paid for the study and testimony disclosed
in a report under Code of Civil Procedure Article 1425(B).
(2) Pecuniary interest does not extend to any of the following:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1352 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 437
(a) Past or present employment of a party.
(b) Ownership of one percent or less of an entity with a financial interest in
the matter.
(c) The provision of services by a healthcare professional that is the treating
physician of a party.
Section 2. Code of Civil Procedure Article 1425(B) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 1425. Experts; pretrial disclosures; scope of discovery
* * *
B. Upon contradictory motion of any party or on the court's own motion, an
order may be entered requiring that each party that has retained or specially
employed a person to provide expert testimony in the case or whose duties as an
employee of the party regularly involve giving expert testimony provide a written
report prepared and signed by the witness. The report shall contain a complete
statement of all opinions to be expressed and the basis and reasons therefor and the
data or other information considered by the witness in forming the opinions. The
parties, upon agreement, or if ordered by the court, shall include in the report any or
all of the following:
(1) exhibits Exhibits to be used as a summary of or support for the opinions;.
(2) the The qualifications of the witness, including a list of all publications
authored by the witness within the preceding ten years;.
(3) the The compensation to be paid for the study and testimony;.
(4) The disclosure of past cases in which the witness held a pecuniary
interest, as defined in Code of Evidence Article 702(D), in the outcome of the case
including the name of the case and the nature and value of the compensation.
(5) a A listing of any other cases in which the witness has testified as an
expert at trial or by deposition within the preceding four years.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1352 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 437